   Executive Committee | CEO Christopher J. Nassetta | Hilton                                                  Go to Navigation Skip the Navigation - Go to Content                 Language:   English   Français   Español   日本語   中文   اللغة العربية   Türkçe   Deutsch   Русский   Italiano   Português   한국어   Polski     Français   English   Español   日本語   中文   اللغة العربية   Türkçe   Deutsch   Русский   Italiano   Português   한국어   Polski     Español   English   Français   日本語   中文   اللغة العربية   Türkçe   Deutsch   Русский   Italiano   Português   한국어   Polski     日本語   English   Français   Español   中文   اللغة العربية   Türkçe   Deutsch   Русский   Italiano   Português   한국어   Polski     中文   English   Français   Español   日本語   اللغة العربية   Türkçe   Deutsch   Русский   Italiano   Português   한국어   Polski     اللغة العربية   English   Français   Español   日本語   中文   Türkçe   Deutsch   Русский   Italiano   Português   한국어   Polski     Türkçe   English   Français   Español   日本語   中文   اللغة العربية   Deutsch   Русский   Italiano   Português   한국어   Polski     Deutsch   English   Français   Español   日本語   中文   اللغة العربية   Türkçe   Русский   Italiano   Português   한국어   Polski     Русский   English   Français   Español   日本語   中文   اللغة العربية   Türkçe   Deutsch   Italiano   Português   한국어   Polski     Italiano   English   Français   Español   日本語   中文   اللغة العربية   Türkçe   Deutsch   Русский   Português   한국어   Polski     Português   English   Français   Español   日本語   中文   اللغة العربية   Türkçe   Deutsch   Русский   Italiano   한국어   Polski     한국어   English   Français   Español   日本語   中文   اللغة العربية   Türkçe   Deutsch   Русский   Italiano   Português   Polski     Polski   English   Français   Español   日本語   中文   اللغة العربية   Türkçe   Deutsch   Русский   Italiano   Português   한국어     Book a room Book a room Book a room Book a room Book a room Book a room Book a room Book a room Book a room Book a room Book a room Book a room Book a room         About Us      About Us      History & Heritage      Vision, Mission, and Values      Executive Committee      Contact Us        Brand Portfolio      Brand Portfolio Home      Hilton      Waldorf Astoria      Conrad      Canopy      Curio      ⁠⁠⁠Tapestry Collection      DoubleTree by Hilton™      Embassy Suites by Hilton™      Hilton Garden Inn      Hampton by Hilton®      Tru by Hilton™      Homewood Suites      Home2 Suites      Hilton Grand Vacations      Hilton Honors        Development      Development Home      Hilton Performance Advantage      Owner Information      Architecture & Construction      Design Information         Management Services      Develop a Hotel      Disclosure Documents      Our Properties      Contact Our Development Teams        Careers      Corporate Responsibility      Corporate Responsibility      CR at Hilton      Opportunities      Communities      Environment      Our Reporting      Downloads        Investors      Investors Home      News      Events & Presentations      Financial Reporting      Quarterly Results      SEC Filings      Annual Reports        Corporate Governance      Governance Documents      Committee Composition      Board of Directors      Management        Stock Information      Investor Resources      FAQ      Analyst Coverage          Media      Media Home      Hilton News      Our Brands      Media Kit      Resources      Awards                                About Hilton Worldwide/   Executive Committee/  Christopher J. Nassetta       Christopher J. Nassetta     President & Chief Executive Officer  Christopher J. Nassetta is President and Chief Executive Officer for Hilton. He joined the company in 2007.  Previously, Mr. Nassetta was President and Chief Executive Officer of Host Hotels & Resorts, Inc., a position he held since 2000. He joined Host Hotels & Resorts, Inc. in 1995 as Executive Vice President and was elected Chief Operating Officer in 1997.  Before joining Host Hotels & Resorts, Inc., Mr. Nassetta co-founded Bailey Capital Corporation in 1991, where he was responsible for the operations of the real estate investment and advisory firm. Prior to founding Bailey Capital Corporation, he spent seven years at The Oliver Carr Company, ultimately serving as Chief Development Officer. In this role, he was responsible for all development and related activities for one of the largest commercial real estate companies in the mid-Atlantic region.  Mr. Nassetta serves on multiple boards and organizations including:   World Travel & Tourism Council – Executive Committee Member for the organization that works to raise awareness of Travel & Tourism as one of the world's largest industries.  International Youth Foundation – Board Member for the global organization that seeks to realize the power and promise of young people.  Partners for a New Beginning – Member of the Steering Committee for the organization that deepens connections between the U.S. and local communities in the Middle East, North Africa, and South Asia through public-private partnerships.  CoStar Group, Inc. – Independent Director of the nation's leading provider of electronic commercial real estate information.  The Real Estate Roundtable – Member and immediate past Chairman of the organization that brings together leaders of the nation's top public and privately-held real estate ownership, development, lending and management firms with the leaders of major national real estate trade associations to jointly address key national policy issues relating to real estate and the overall economy.  Federal City Council – Member of the non-profit, non-partisan organization dedicated to the improvement of the nation's capital.  The Economic Club of Washington, D.C. – Member of the nonprofit that promotes collaboration among business leaders, government officials, and members of the diplomatic corps and creates a forum for them to express their views on the most important economic issues of the day.  Arlington Free Clinic – Supporter of the non-profit, community-based, volunteer-driven organization that is committed to providing access to quality health care services to low-income, uninsured county residents.  Wolf Trap Foundation for the Performing Arts – Director of the organization that offers excellent and innovative performing arts programs for the enrichment, education and enjoyment of diverse audiences and participants.  The John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts – Vice Chairman of the Corporate Fund, which ensures that our national cultural center is the nexus of the performing arts for dance, music and theater.   Mr. Nassetta graduated from the University of Virginia McIntire School of Commerce with a degree in finance. He currently serves on the McIntire School of Commerce Advisory Board.  Download high-resolution photo      Executive Committee     Christopher J. Nassetta  President & Chief Executive Officer      Joe Berger  Executive Vice President & President, Americas      Kristin Campbell  Executive Vice President & General Counsel      Ian R. Carter  President, Global Development, Architecture, Design & Construction      Katie Beirne Fallon  Global Head of Corporate Affairs, Hilton      Kevin Jacobs  Chief Financial Officer      Martin Rinck  Executive Vice President & President, Asia Pacific      Matthew W. Schuyler  Chief Human Resources Officer      Chris Silcock  Executive Vice President and Chief Commercial Officer      Simon Vincent  Executive Vice President & President, Europe, Middle East & Africa      Jonathan W. Witter  Chief Customer Officer                       Skip to top of page            Waldorf Astoria Collection   Offers unforgettable experiences at iconic destinations around the world.        Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.      Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.      Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.      Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.      Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.      Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.      Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.      Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.      Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.      Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.      Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.      Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.      Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.        Canopy   Energizing neighborhood hotels that create a positive stay with simple pleasures, thoughtful extras and nice surprises.       Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.      Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.      Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.      Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.      Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.      Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.      Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.      Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.      Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.      Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.      Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.      Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.      Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.        Curio   A collection of unique hotels, each with its own history and character in cities across the globe.       DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.      DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.      DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.      DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.      DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.      DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.      DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.      DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.  n>     DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.      DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.      DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.      DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.      DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.        Tapestry Collection   A collection of hotels that gives you the peace of mind to travel independently.       Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.      Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.      Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.      Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.      Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.      Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.      Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.      Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.      Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.      Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.      Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.      Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.      Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.        Hilton Garden Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.      Hilton Garden Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.      Hilton Garden Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.      Hilton Garden Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.      Hilton Garden Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.      Hilton Garden Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.      Hilton Garden Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.      Hilton Garden Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.      Hilton Garden Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.      Hilton Garden Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.      Hilton Garden Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.      Hilton G Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.      Hilton Garden Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.        Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.      Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.      Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.      Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.      Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.      Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.      Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.      Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.      Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.      Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.      Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.      Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.      Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.        Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.      Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.      Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.      Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.      Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.      Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.      Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.      Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.      Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.      Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.      Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.      Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.      Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.        Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.      Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.      Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.      Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.      Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.      Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.      Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.      Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.      Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.      Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.      Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.      Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.      Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.        Home2 Suites by Hilton   Comfy, stylish and packed with perks for the value conscious, extended stay traveler.        Hilton Grand Vacations   High-quality vacation ownership resorts in celebrated destinations.                   Hotel Reservations   Global Hotel Directory   Reservation FAQ   Hilton HHonors      Specials & Packages   Hilton HHonors Specials   Hotel Specials   Resorts & Leisure      Groups & Meetings   e-Events Advanced Search   Request for Proposal   Weddings      Customer Service   Reservations & Customer Care   Customer Support   Our Best Rates. Guaranteed.          About Us   History & Heritage   Vision, Mission, and Values   Executive Committee   Contact Us     Brand Portfolio   Hilton Hotels & Resorts   Waldorf Astoria Hotels & Resorts   Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Canopy   Curio   ⁠⁠⁠Tapestry Collection   DoubleTree by Hilton™   Embassy Suites by Hilton™   Hilton Garden Inn   Hampton by Hilton®   Tru by Hilton™   Homewood Suites by Hilton   Home2 Suites by Hilton   Hilton Grand Vacations   Hilton Honors     Development   Hilton Performance Advantage   Owner Information   Architecture & Construction   Management Services   Develop a Hotel   Disclosure Documents   Our Properties   Contact Our Development Teams     Careers   Discover Hilton   Our Brands   Universities   Areas of Talent   Search All Jobs   U.S. Military     Corporate Responsibility   CR at Hilton   Opportunities   Communities   Environment   Our Reporting   Downloads     Investors   News   Events & Presentations   Financial Reporting   Corporate Governance   Stock Information   Investor Resources     Media   Hilton News   Our Brands   Media Kit   Resources   Awards       Language:   English   Français   Español   日本語   中文   اللغة العربية   Türkçe   Deutsch   Русский   Italiano   Português   한국어   Polski                                             Book a Room Book a Room Book a Room Book a Room Book a Room Book a Room Book a Room Book a Room Book a Room Book a Room Book a Room Book a Room Book a Room   Travel Agents   Site Map  1-800-HILTONS (1-800-445-8667)  Customer Support    Privacy Policy Privacy Policy Privacy Policy Privacy Policy Privacy Policy Privacy Policy Privacy Policy Privacy Policy Privacy Policy Privacy Policy Privacy Policy Privacy Policy Privacy Policy   Site Usage Agreement  © 2017 Hilton                         Corporate Executive Committee | Hospitality Industry | Hilton Worldwide                                                  Go to Navigation Skip the Navigation - Go to Content                 Language:   English   Français   Español   日本語   中文   اللغة العربية   Türkçe   Deutsch   Русский   Italiano   Português   한국어   Polski     Français   English   Español   日本語   中文   اللغة العربية   Türkçe   Deutsch   Русский   Italiano   Português   한국어   Polski     Español   English   Français   日本語   中文   اللغة العربية   Türkçe   Deutsch   Русский   Italiano   Português   한국어   Polski     日本語   English   Français   Español   中文   اللغة العربية   Türkçe   Deutsch   Русский   Italiano   Português   한국어   Polski     中文   English   Français   Español   日本語   اللغة العربية   Türkçe   Deutsch   Русский   Italiano   Português   한국어   Polski     اللغة العربية   English   Français   Español   日本語   中文   Türkçe   Deutsch   Русский   Italiano   Português   한국어   Polski     Türkçe   English   Français   Español   日本語   中文   اللغة العربية   Deutsch   Русский   Italiano   Português   한국어   Polski     Deutsch   English   Français   Español   日本語   中文   اللغة العربية   Türkçe   Русский   Italiano   Português   한국어   Polski     Русский   English   Français   Español   日本語   中文   اللغة العربية   Türkçe   Deutsch   Italiano   Português   한국어   Polski     Italiano   English   Français   Español   日本語   中文   اللغة العربية   Türkçe   Deutsch   Русский   Português   한국어   Polski     Português   English   Français   Español   日本語   中文   اللغة العربية   Türkçe   Deutsch   Русский   Italiano   한국어   Polski     한국어   English   Français   Español   日本語   中文   اللغة العربية   Türkçe   Deutsch   Русский   Italiano   Português   Polski     Polski   English   Français   Español   日本語   中文   اللغة العربية   Türkçe   Deutsch   Русский   Italiano   Português   한국어     Book a room Book a room Book a room Book a room Book a room Book a room Book a room Book a room Book a room Book a room Book a room Book a room Book a room         About Us      About Us      History & Heritage      Vision, Mission, and Values      Executive Committee      Contact Us        Brand Portfolio      Brand Portfolio Home      Hilton      Waldorf Astoria      Conrad      Canopy      Curio      ⁠⁠⁠Tapestry Collection      DoubleTree by Hilton™      Embassy Suites by Hilton™      Hilton Garden Inn      Hampton by Hilton®      Tru by Hilton™      Homewood Suites      Home2 Suites      Hilton Grand Vacations      Hilton Honors        Development      Development Home      Hilton Performance Advantage      Owner Information      Architecture & Construction      Design Information         Management Services      Develop a Hotel      Disclosure Documents      Our Properties      Contact Our Development Teams        Careers      Corporate Responsibility      Corporate Responsibility      CR at Hilton      Opportunities      Communities      Environment      Our Reporting      Downloads        Investors      Investors Home      News      Events & Presentations      Financial Reporting      Quarterly Results      SEC Filings      Annual Reports        Corporate Governance      Governance Documents      Committee Composition      Board of Directors      Management        Stock Information      Investor Resources      FAQ      Analyst Coverage          Media      Media Home      Hilton News      Our Brands      Media Kit      Resources      Awards                               About Hilton/  Executive Committee     Shaping global success.  Collectively, our Executive Committee brings over 200 years of experience to the company. With diverse backgrounds and proven track records of success, they're well positioned to keep Hilton at the forefront of the hospitality industry.                      Executive Committee      Christopher J. Nassetta President & Chief Executive Officer  View profile         Joe Berger Executive Vice President & President, Americas  View profile       Kristin Campbell Executive Vice President &General Counsel  View profile       Ian R. Carter President, Global Development, Architecture, Design & Construction  View profile       Katie Beirne Fallon Global Head of Corporate Affairs, Hilton  View profile       Kevin Jacobs Chief Financial Officer  View profile       Martin Rinck Executive Vice President & President, Asia Pacific  View profile       Matthew W. Schuyler  Chief Human Resources Officer  View profile       Chris Silcock Executive Vice President and Chief Commercial Officer  View profile       Simon Vincent Executive Vice President & President, Europe, Middle East & Africa  View profile       Jonathan W. Witter Chief Customer Officer  View profile                       Skip to top of page            Waldorf Astoria Collection   Offers unforgettable experiences at iconic destinations around the world.        Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.      Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.      Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.      Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.      Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.      Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.      Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.      Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.      Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.      Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.      Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.      Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.      Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Offers smart luxury travelers inspiring connections and intuitive service in a world of style.        Canopy   Energizing neighborhood hotels that create a positive stay with simple pleasures, thoughtful extras and nice surprises.       Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.      Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.      Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.      Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.      Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.      Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.      Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.      Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.      Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.      Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.      Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.      Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.      Hilton Hotels   The stylish, forward-thinking global leader in hospitality.        Curio   A collection of unique hotels, each with its own history and character in cities across the globe.       DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.      DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.      DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.      DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.      DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.      DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.      DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.      DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.  n>     DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.      DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.      DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.      DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.      DoubleTree   Warm. Comfortable. Friendly. Providing true upscale comfort to today's business and leisure travellers.        Tapestry Collection   A collection of hotels that gives you the peace of mind to travel independently.       Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.      Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.      Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.      Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.      Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.      Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.      Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.      Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.      Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.      Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.      Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.      Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.      Embassy Suites Hotels   Relaxed, upscale environment with all-suite locations in the U.S., Canada and Latin America.        Hilton Garden Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.      Hilton Garden Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.      Hilton Garden Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.      Hilton Garden Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.      Hilton Garden Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.      Hilton Garden Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.      Hilton Garden Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.      Hilton Garden Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.      Hilton Garden Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.      Hilton Garden Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.      Hilton Garden Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.      Hilton G Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.      Hilton Garden Inn   Offers the amenities and services that allow guests to discover and connect while on the road.        Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.      Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.      Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.      Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.      Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.      Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.      Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.      Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.      Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.      Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.      Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.      Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.      Hampton Hotels   Quality experience, great value and friendly service in its signature Hamptonality style.        Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.      Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.      Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.      Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.      Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.      Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.      Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.      Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.      Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.      Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.      Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.      Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.      Tru by Hilton   A revolutionary new brand that is simplified, spirited and grounded in value for guests with a zest for life and a desire for human connection.        Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.      Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.      Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.      Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.      Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.      Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.      Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.      Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.      Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.      Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.      Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.      Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.      Homewood Suites by Hilton   For guests seeking home-like accommodations when traveling for an extended stay.        Home2 Suites by Hilton   Comfy, stylish and packed with perks for the value conscious, extended stay traveler.        Hilton Grand Vacations   High-quality vacation ownership resorts in celebrated destinations.                   Hotel Reservations   Global Hotel Directory   Reservation FAQ   Hilton HHonors      Specials & Packages   Hilton HHonors Specials   Hotel Specials   Resorts & Leisure      Groups & Meetings   e-Events Advanced Search   Request for Proposal   Weddings      Customer Service   Reservations & Customer Care   Customer Support   Our Best Rates. Guaranteed.          About Us   History & Heritage   Vision, Mission, and Values   Executive Committee   Contact Us     Brand Portfolio   Hilton Hotels & Resorts   Waldorf Astoria Hotels & Resorts   Conrad Hotels & Resorts   Canopy   Curio   ⁠⁠⁠Tapestry Collection   DoubleTree by Hilton™   Embassy Suites by Hilton™   Hilton Garden Inn   Hampton by Hilton®   Tru by Hilton™   Homewood Suites by Hilton   Home2 Suites by Hilton   Hilton Grand Vacations   Hilton Honors     Development   Hilton Performance Advantage   Owner Information   Architecture & Construction   Management Services   Develop a Hotel   Disclosure Documents   Our Properties   Contact Our Development Teams     Careers   Discover Hilton   Our Brands   Universities   Areas of Talent   Search All Jobs   U.S. Military     Corporate Responsibility   CR at Hilton   Opportunities   Communities   Environment   Our Reporting   Downloads     Investors   News   Events & Presentations   Financial Reporting   Corporate Governance   Stock Information   Investor Resources     Media   Hilton News   Our Brands   Media Kit   Resources   Awards       Language:   English   Français   Español   日本語   中文   اللغة العربية   Türkçe   Deutsch   Русский   Italiano   Português   한국어   Polski                                             Book a Room Book a Room Book a Room Book a Room Book a Room Book a Room Book a Room Book a Room Book a Room Book a Room Book a Room Book a Room Book a Room   Travel Agents   Site Map  1-800-HILTONS (1-800-445-8667)  Customer Support    Privacy Policy Privacy Policy Privacy Policy Privacy Policy Privacy Policy Privacy Policy Privacy Policy Privacy Policy Privacy Policy Privacy Policy Privacy Policy Privacy Policy Privacy Policy   Site Usage Agreement  © 2017 Hilton                      

	Christopher J. Nassetta










































Stock Info


Fundamentals


Filings & Reports


Governance


Events


Info Request


Analysts


Reports


Section 16 Filings










Company


Brands




















  Laura C. Kaplan 




 David J. Steinberg  


















Christopher J. Nassetta Director  Christopher J. Nassetta has been the President and Chief Executive Officer of Hilton Worldwide (fka Hilton Hotels corporation), a global hospitality company, since December 2007.  Prior to joining Hilton Worldwide, Mr. Nassetta served as the President and Chief Executive Officer of Host Hotels & Resorts (fka Host Marriott Corporation), a lodging real estate investment trust and owner of luxury and upper upscale hotels, from May 2000 to December 2007.  Mr. Nassetta joined Host Hotels & Resorts in 1995 as Executive Vice President and was elected the Chief Operating Officer in 1997.  Prior to joining Host Hotels & Resorts, Mr. Nassetta served as President of Bailey Realty Corporation from 1991 until 1995, and he had previously served as Chief Development Officer and in various other positions with the Oliver Carr Company from 1984 through 1991.  Mr. Nassetta serves as a member of the Real Estate Roundtable, as an Advisory Board member for the McIntire School of Commerce at the University of Virginia, and as Vice Chairman of the Corporate Fund for The John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts.  Mr. Nassetta is a member of Federal City Council, a member of the Steering Committee of Partners for a New Beginning, and is on the boards of the International Youth Foundation, the Wolf Trap Foundation for the Performing Arts, and the Economic Club of Washington, D.C.  Mr. Nassetta previously served on the board of directors of Host Hotels & Resorts.  Mr. Nassetta received a degree in finance from the University of Virginia McIntire School of Commerce.
Through his current and previous positions, Mr. Nassetta brings to the Board significant operational and business development experience, mergers & acquisitions experience, public company board and management experience, leadership experience, as well as commercial real estate industry expertise.  As a user of commercial real estate information, Mr. Nassetta also provides the Board with a client’s perspective on the Company’s business development and mergers & acquisitions strategies, including valuable insight into the potential “fit” of acquisition targets and the development and marketing of products and services. 

















     CoStar Group     Company    Investors    Brands     Social     






800-204-5960

1331 L Street, NW
Washington, DC 20005

CoStar Group, Inc. (NASDAQ: CSGP) is commercial real estate's leading provider of information, analytics and online marketplaces.


888-226-7404

1331 L Street, NW
Washington, DC 20005



CoStar Group, Inc. (NASDAQ: CSGP) is commercial real estate's leading provider of information, analytics and online marketplaces.

  
 

Our Company


Newsroom


Corporate Responsibility


Careers






Stock Info


Fundamentals


Filings & Reports


Corporate Governance


Events & Presentations


Info Request






CoStar


LoopNet


Showcase


CityFeet


ShopProperty


Apartments.com



Apartment Finder


ApartmentHomeLiving


BizBuySell


BizQuest


LandsofAmerica


LandAndFarm




   


Privacy Policy


Terms of Use


Contact Us





© 2017. CoStar Realty Information Inc.


















Christopher Nassetta, Hilton Worldwide Services Ltd: Profile & Biography - Bloomberg


































































  



























Feedback





Christopher Nassetta

President/CEO,
Hilton Worldwide Services Ltd






Career History




President/CEO
Hilton Worldwide Holdings Inc, 12/2007-PRESENT


Co-Founder
Bailey Capital Corp, PRESENT


President/CEO
Hilton Worldwide Services Ltd, PRESENT


President/CEO
Host Hotels & Resorts Inc, 4/2006-12/2007


President/CEO
Host Marriott Corp, 5/2000-4/2006


Chief Operating Officer
Host Marriott Corp, 1997-5/2000


Executive Vice President
Host Marriott Corp, 10/1995-1997


President
Bailey Realty Corp, 1991-1995


Chief Development Officer
Oliver Carr Company, FORMER


Show More









Website:
www.hiltonworldwide.com






Corporate Information
Address:

Maple Court, Central Park
Reeds Crescent
Watford, WD24 4QQ
United Kingdom


Phone:
44-2078-568-000


Fax:
-


Web url:
www.hiltonworldwide.com











From The Web












Personal Information



Education



Mcintire School of Commerce
Bachelor's Degree, Finance








Memberships



Board Memberships




International Youth Foundation Inc


Board Member, PRESENT




Wolf Trap Foundation for The Performing Arts


Board Member, PRESENT




Hilton Worldwide Holdings Inc


Board Member, 12/2007-PRESENT




Costar Group Inc


Board Member, 6/2002-PRESENT




Host Hotels & Resorts Inc


Board Member, 4/2006-12/2007




Host Marriott Corp


Board Member, 1999-4/2006




American Skiing Co


Board Member, FORMER




Crestline Capital Corp


Board Member, FORMER




Prime Group Realty Trust


Trustee, 11/1997-UNKNOWN



Show More





Other Memberships




Natl Assoc of Real Estate Investment Trusts


Board Member




Real Estate Roundtable


Board Member




Federal City Council 


Member




Arlington Free Clinic 


Member




John F Kennedy Center for The Performing Arts 


Member



Show More








Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data






































Nassetta, Christopher J. - The Wall Street Transcript













































 





































Christopher J. Nassetta
CHRISTOPHER J. NASSETTA is currently President and Chief Executive
Officer of Host Marriott Corporation. He also serves on the Board of
Directors of the company. Before joining Host Marriott, Mr. Nassetta co-
founded Bailey Capital Corporation in 1991, where he was responsible for
the operations of the real estate investment and advisory firm. Since
its formation, Bailey Capital Corporation has acquired in excess of $500
million in assets nationwide and has managed in excess of $1 billion in
third-party assets. Prior to founding Bailey Capital Corporation, Mr.
Nassetta spent seven years with The Oliver Carr Company, ultimately
serving as Chief Development Officer. In this role, he was responsible
for all development and related activities for one of the largest
commercial real estate companies in the mid-Atlantic region. Prior to
his role as Chief Development Officer, Mr. Nassetta served as
Development Director, as well as Vice President and Regional Partner,
where he was responsible for all suburban operations. Mr. Nassetta also
served as a member of the four-person management committee responsible
for overall management of the company. Currently, Mr. Nassetta serves on
the Board of Trustees for Prime Group Realty and as a member of the
McIntire School of Commerce Advisory Board for the University of
Virginia. Mr. Nassetta graduated from the University of Virginia
McIntire School of Commerce with a degree in Finance and studied
International Finance at the London School of Economics. He resides in
Arlington, Virginia with his wife and four children.
Related Interviews:Christopher Nassetta - Host Marriott Corporation (hmt)November 07, 2000Christopher Nassetta - Host Marriott Corporation (hmt)April 06, 2000







CartLatest NewsJames Abate of Centre Asset Management Sees Consumer Demand Driving New Stock HighsMalcolm E. Polley of Stewart Capital and How to Play the Health Care StocksTimothy Biltz, CEO of Lumos Networks Identifies the Key Component for Future 5G NetworksThe Wall Street Transcript is a completely unique resource for investors and business researchers.Over 20,000 CEO, Equity Analyst and Money Manager InterviewsSubscribe now!Sign Up For Newsletter Weekly email with New In-Depth Interviews


Email: 



Most Popular InterviewsDelivering Long-Term Results with a Risk-Managed Growth FundJames A. Abate Published July 20, 2017 in Investing StrategiesCompanies covered: AMAT JNJ COH RL COG NVDA ADBE ATVI KLAC AMZN NFLX GOOG FB GLW MU 005930 000660 WFM JWN CMG GPS EQT RICE SPLS Buy ($25)Finding Investments with Favorable Risk and Reward OpportunitiesHenry  Beukema Published July 19, 2017 in Investing StrategiesCompanies covered: ORCL MSFT NSRGY AMZN WFM LRLCY AGN LNR Buy ($25)Better Returns and Lower Risk in the Midcap SpaceMalcolm E. Polley Published July 18, 2017 in Investing StrategiesCompanies covered: PRAA HURN FII FL NKE AMZN WFM WBA RAD Buy ($25)Most Popular ReportsWireless Communications & Telecom Published July 14, 2017Buy ($175)Investing Strategies Published July 11, 2017Buy ($175)Investing Strategies Published June 30, 2017Buy ($175) 






Top Company Interviews






Register for a Free Account to gain greater access to
            The Wall Street Transcript right now




CEO INTERVIEWSInterview with the President and CEO: Lumos Networks Corp. (NASDAQ:LMOS)Interview with the Corporate VP of Business Development, Strategy and Investor Relations: DSP Group, Inc. (NASDAQ:DSPG)Interview with the CEO and Director: Tactile Systems Technology, Inc. (NASDAQ:TCMD) 

SECTOR ROUNDTABLESNatural Gas Weighs Heavy On E&P Near-Term ProspectsRoundtable Forum:optimism Despite Uncertainty In For-profit EducationRoundtable Forum:a Shift In Focus To Natural Gas From Oil 

MONEY MANAGER INTERVIEWSDelivering Long-Term Results with a Risk-Managed Growth FundFinding Investments with Favorable Risk and Reward OpportunitiesBetter Returns and Lower Risk in the Midcap Space 

ANALYST INTERVIEWSAnalyzing the Secular Drivers Within Communications Infrastructure and TelecomSatellite Companies Benefiting from Growth in Data TrafficIncreased Focus on Content as Consumers Shift to Digital Consumption 




Subscribe Today!







                Since 1963
                © The Wall Street Transcript 1997-2016
Terms and Conditions
Privacy Policy  
            





https://www.twst.com/wp-admin/admin-ajax.php

Pin It on Pinterest





































Share This





Twitter





Facebook





Google+





Gmail





LinkedIn








































×





Join now for free!
Already a member?






First Name 





Last Name 





Email address *








Create new account
 


or create an account with a social network.

Join with Facebook


Join with Twitter


Join with Google








Username or Email address: *





Password: *






LoginJoin now! | Forgot password?
 


or login using a social network


Log in with Facebook


Log in with Twitter


Log in with Google





















Christopher J. Nassetta - Executive Bio, Compensation History, and Contacts - Equilar Atlas










 

















Log in | Sign up








x

 






As Featured In




















Christopher J. Nassetta
Dir., President and Chief Executive Officer at Hilton, Inc.


View Full Profile
Are you Christopher J. Nassetta? Claim your profile


 


Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Christopher J. Nassetta's full profile. 
With Equilar Atlas, you can:



IDENTIFY corporate executives in Christopher J. Nassetta's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Christopher J. Nassetta's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Christopher J. Nassetta through your network of contacts.
												








Christopher J. Nassetta's Executive Work History


Current


Dir., President and Chief Executive Officer, 
Hilton, Inc.


Board Member, 
CoStar Group, Inc.


Past
To view Christopher J. Nassetta's complete executive work history, sign up now
Education


														 Bachelor's, 
															University of Virginia


Age
54

 
 


Christopher J. Nassetta's Biography



Christopher J. Nassetta has been the President and Chief Executive Officer of Hilton Worldwide (fka Hilton Hotels Corporation), a global hospitality company, since December 2007. Prior to joining Hilton Worldwide, Mr. Nassetta served as the President and Chief Executive Officer of Host Hotels & Resorts (fka Host Marriott Corporation), a lodging real estate investment trust and owner of luxury and upscale hotels, from May 2000 to December 2007. Mr. Nassetta joined Host Hotels & Resorts in 1995 as Executive Vice President and was elected the Chief Operating Officer in 1997. Prior to joining Host Hotels & Resorts, Mr. Nassetta served as Presiden ...
(Read More)

			Christopher J. Nassetta has been the President and Chief Executive Officer of Hilton Worldwide (fka Hilton Hotels Corporation), a global hospitality company, since December 2007. Prior to joining Hilton Worldwide, Mr. Nassetta served as the President and Chief Executive Officer of Host Hotels & Resorts (fka Host Marriott Corporation), a lodging real estate investment trust and owner of luxury and upscale hotels, from May 2000 to December 2007. Mr. Nassetta joined Host Hotels & Resorts in 1995 as Executive Vice President and was elected the Chief Operating Officer in 1997. Prior to joining Host Hotels & Resorts, Mr. Nassetta served as President of Bailey Realty Corporation from 1991 until 1995, and he had previously served as Chief Development Officer and in various other positions with the Oliver Carr Company from 1984 through 1991. Mr. Nassetta serves as a member of the Real Estate Roundtable, as an Advisory Board member for the McIntire School of Commerce at the University of Virginia, and as Vice Chairman of the Corporate Fund for The John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts. Mr. Nassetta is a member of Federal City Council, a member of the Steering Committee of Partners for a New Beginning, and is on the boards of the International Youth Foundation, the Wolf Trap Foundation for the Performing Arts, and the Economic Club of Washington, D.C. Mr. Nassetta previously served on the board of directors of Host Hotels & Resorts. Mr. Nassetta received a degree in finance from the University of Virginia McIntire School of Commerce. Mr. Nassetta is 54 years old. 

Through his current and previous positions, Mr. Nassetta brings to the Board significant operational and business development experience, mergers & acquisitions experience, public company board and management experience, leadership experience, as well as commercial real estate industry expertise. As a user of commercial real estate information, Mr. Nassetta also provides the Board with a client's perspective on the Company's business development and mergers & acquisitions strategies, including valuable insight into the potential "fit" of acquisition targets and the development and marketing of products and services.
		
Source: CoStar Group, Inc. on 04/13/2017
		
	

 






Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Christopher J. Nassetta's full profile. 



												By accessing Equilar Atlas, you can view bios, network, salary and wealth events
												of industry-leading executives like Christopher J. Nassetta. More specifically, you'll be able to:
												

IDENTIFY corporate executives in Christopher J. Nassetta's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Christopher J. Nassetta's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Christopher J. Nassetta through your network of conections.
												




View Full Profile


 








Search for over 360,000 executive profiles.





/bio



													Example: Christopher J. Nassetta


















Christopher J. Nassetta's Connections (99)





Sign up now to view Christopher J. Nassetta's 99 connections »









Kristin A. Campbell
Executive Vice President and General Counsel, Hilton, Inc.









Jon M. Huntsman
Board Member, Ford Motor Company









Matthew J. Hart
Board Member, Air Lease









Andrew C. Florance
Dir., Chief Executive Officer and President, CoStar Group, Inc.









Ian R. Carter
Executive Vice President and President, Development, Architecture and Construction, Hilton, Inc.









Douglas M. Steenland
Chairman of the Board, American International Group, Inc.









Josiah O. Low
Former Board Member, Rosetta Resources, Inc.









John M. Sabin
Board Member, Hersha Hospitality Trust









Elizabeth A. Abdoo
Executive Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary, Host Hotels & Resorts, Inc.









Elizabeth A. Smith
Chairman of the Board and Chief Executive Officer, Bloomin' Brands, Inc.








Popular Profiles






														Sign up now to view more executive profiles »
														









Thomas J. Lynch
Executive Chairman, TE Connectivity Ltd.









John J. Kita
EVP and CFO, A. O. Smith









Elon R. Musk
CEO and Chairman, Tesla









Daniel A. DeMatteo
Executive Chairman, GameStop Corp.









David J. O'Connor
President and CEO, The Madison Square Garden Company












×

Claim Your Profile Coming Soon
Interested in updating your biography and work history?
We're working on making it happen.
We'll email you when this feature is available.
Please enter valid email address.

Done


Thank you for your interest.
Ok






			Browse executive profiles:
			
				 A
			
				 B
			
				 C
			
				 D
			
				 E
			
				 F
			
				 G
			
				 H
			
				 I
			
				 J
			
				 K
			
				 L
			
				 M
			
				 N
			
				 O
			
				 P
			
				 Q
			
				 R
			
				 S
			
				 T
			
				 U
			
				 V
			
				 W
			
				 X
			
				 Y
			
				 Z



Equilar Homepage
Equilar Atlas
Equilar Insight
Equilar BoardEdge
Equilar Engage
Research Services
Knowledge Network
About Us
Login

� 2017 Equilar All Rights Reserved. Privacy Policy
1100 Marshall Street, Redwood City, CA 94063 | Phone (650) 241-6600 | Fax (650) 701-0993
















Christopher J. Nassetta | Green Hotelier






















































Register
Site Map
Privacy & Cookies Policy













            
            	            
            	Welcome Guest - Sign in | Register






















Home
About Us

Advertising on Green Hotelier
Contributing to Green Hotelier
Green Hotelier’s Editorial Plan 2017


Themes

Waste
Water
Community, Communication & Engagement
Energy & Carbon
New Builds & Retro Fits
Policy, Certification & Economics
Supply Chain
Workplace


Destinations

Africa & The Middle East
Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe


Best Practice

Industry Leaders
Case Studies
Talking Point


Resources

Manuals
Know How Guides
Useful Organisations
Tools
Further Reading
Environmental Management for Hotels
Sustainable Siting Construction and Design


News

Industry News
Events


Contact Us

FAQs


Directory

Energy
Housekeeping
Kitchen
Water





 

Christopher J. Nassetta

October 29, 2009  |  
Filed under: Industry Leaders  |  
Posted by: admin


Position - Former President and CEO, Hilton Hotels Corporation
Background
Christopher J. Nassetta joined Hilton Hotels Corporation as president and CEO in December 2007. Previously he was president CEO of Host Hotels & Resorts, Inc. a position he held since 2000. He joined Host in 1995 as executive vice president and was elected chief operating officer in 1997. Before joining Host, Mr Nassetta co-founded Bailey Capital Corporation in 1991, where he was responsible for the operations of the real estate investment and advisory firm. Prior to founding Bailey Capital Corporation, he spent seven years at The Oliver Carr Company, ultimately serving as chief development officer. In this role he was responsible for all development and related activities for one of the largest commercial real estate companies in the mid-Atlantic region. Mr Nassetta serves on the following boards and organisations:-

CoStar Group Inc
The Real Estate Roundtable, which he chairs
Federal City Council member
McIntire School of Commerce Advisory Board for the University of Virginia.
Los Angeles World Affairs Council

Christopher discusses Hilton
It is challenging to measure the success of business earned from individual business and leisure travellers based on our sustainability commitments and activities. We believe that guests choose our Hilton Family of Hotels primarily based on their strong reputation for providing excellent products and services. Hospitality is our business. Sustainability is a lens, a discipline we use to support our overall business of hospitality.
Having said that, we are reviewing our purchasing, design and construction practices, as well as brand standards to maximise efficiencies in all areas while maintaining the highest levels of customer satisfaction. The company’s We Care! programme throughout Europe, which is being rolled into the more recent global commitments outlined herein, reported last April that reduction in energy and water consumption resulted in saving more than US$9m since the programme started in 2005—proving that sustainability is good business.
Moving forward, our mission is to manage our business through a lens of sustainability and find ways to innovate with our products and offerings. We will create better experiences for our guests, better business opportunities for our partners and investors, better work facilities for our colleagues and better serve our communities. By managing our business in this fashion, and supporting our overall strategic objectives, we feel we will create tangible business value for all of our stakeholders.
I'm most proud of our team members across the globe, and the passion and enthusiasm they show every day for not only providing the best guest experience possible, but finding ways to accomplish this with a like-minded focus on minimising our impact on the environment. Our team members are the real innovators and it is their efforts that I am most proud of. Beyond that, in our European region, energy and water consumption have already been reduced by 10% in the past two years. In the UK and Ireland, the introduction of carbon-free electricity has reduced CO2 emissions in participating Hilton hotels by more than 64,000 tons, or 56% of our carbon footprint. In the United States, Hilton was the first in the industry to complete the installation of a commercial fuel cell power system, atop the Hilton New York, delivering one of the cleanest power-generating technologies available today.
I think the biggest lesson so far is that we still have much to learn. To meet the growing demand of increased travel around the world, we must be able to do so in a genuine, sustainable fashion while still delivering unsurpassed levels of hospitality, including a better night’s sleep, an enhanced dining experience and a more productive meeting. We must operate our business in ways that provide for our current needs while allowing future generations to meet their own needs. This is the essence of sustainability and the path we must follow. Not only is it the right thing to do as responsible global citizens, it's the right thing to do for our business. We have come a long way as a company and have learned so much to date, but I am personally excited about the opportunities and challenges in front of us as we continue our journey.
Education will play a vital role for Hilton Hotels Corporation in the short- and long-term on multiple levels. As it relates to sustainability, Hilton Hotels Corporation is supporting its portfolio of commitments in a number of ways by:

Building educational and engagement programmes for all brands and team members, including online learning, centralised web content and various training modules.
Measuring and reporting on our progress. The internal environmental management tool used within company-managed hotels will be extended to all properties, allowing us to track and report on our commitments and design processes and programmes that identify areas of opportunity to drive innovation and efficiencies.
Revising brand operational and design and construction standards for 2009 to ensure both internal and external best practices are shared, adopted and transparent around the globe.
Evaluating all current and future purchasing policies and practices across the brands to ensure that the range of products placed in hotels not only enhances the guest experience but drives value for owners while supporting the company’s overall sustainability efforts.

The sum of these parts will hopefully begin to lay a foundation of knowledge around sustainability and allow us to effectively build sustainability into the organisation in a measurable and meaningful way.
We plan to build on the foundation and success established by our teams in Europe, Africa and the UK as well as our global HR learning and development team. The evolution will include a portfolio of content to engage our team members and guests, share best practices and supply tips, resources, and knowledge. The end result is hopefully to provide our stakeholders with a tool kit that will empower each person to make the most effective decisions possible around understanding sustainability and our impacts while looking at our business through a new lens that will enhance the guest experience and drive business value.
Right now there are several macro economic issues that are driving sustainability. Irrespective of where you stand on climate change, it remains fact that population growth, globalisation, and industrialisation are all accelerating the depletion of natural resources. Demand for energy and food continues to grow and fresh water scarcity is becoming a reality. How we respond to these challenges in meaningful ways will determine the sustainability of our future lifestyles, our communities as we know them and ultimately the sustainability of our planet.
In addition to these large macro issues, we're seeing a growing awareness from our guests, business partners, governments, and team members. These issues are not regional, temporary, or independent of one another and, going forward, we must act and focus on sustainability in a thoughtful, coordinated, and disciplined manner.
As a result of these drivers, Hilton Hotels Corporation recently announced its short- and long-term goals and objectives towards building sustainability into the core fabric of its businesses worldwide. By 2014, goals for the Hilton family of hotels are to:

Reduce energy consumption from direct operations by 20%
Reduce Co2 emissions by 20%
Reduce output of waste by 20% and
Reduce water consumption by 10%

As a global business serving more than a quarter billion guests a year in more than 3,000 hotels across 74 countries and territories, the Hilton family of hotels, including Hilton, Conrad Hotels & Resorts, Doubletree, Embassy Suites Hotels, Hampton Inn and Suites, Hilton Garden Inn, Hilton Grand Vacations, Homewood Suites by Hilton and The Waldorf-Astoria Collection, are well-positioned to make a difference environmentally, socially, culturally and economically.
In addition to the stated measurable short-term targets, the company has also committed to focusing on several high-impact areas that offer significant long-term benefits. Sustainable buildings and operations, including the advancement of sustainable design and construction, operations, chemical management and purchasing will be one key area. We also are committed to the advancement of renewable energy as a source of power for our operations, not only to reduce our carbon footprint but to develop a viable commercial infrastructure for powering hotels and corporate offices.
 Email This Post
   
				 Print This Post
FacebookTwitterLinkedinGoogleRSS



Leave a Reply Cancel replyYou must be logged in to post a comment. 
 

Green Hotelier Newsletter





Subscribe to our mailing list






  

 

Latest
Popular
Comments





 Tongsai Bay: champions of nature
by Siobhan O'Neill - July 17, 2017


 Diamond Resorts share the sustainability message
by Siobhan O'Neill - July 14, 2017


 Talking Point: Are you sending your water straight down the drain?
by Siobhan O'Neill - July 11, 2017


 Power hungry hotels need to reduce their future energy needs now
by Siobhan O'Neill - July 10, 2017


 Talking Point: How can hotels work with refugees?
by Siobhan O'Neill - July 4, 2017






 Water Management and Responsibility in Hotels
by Holly Tuppen - March 22, 2013


 Simple steps to reducing energy consumption
by Holly Tuppen - January 4, 2013


 Reducing and Managing Food Waste in Hotels
by Holly Tuppen - September 2, 2014


 Cyprus takes the lead on sustainable destinations
by Siobhan O'Neill - June 18, 2014


 Brazil World Cup tourism – negative or positive impact?
by Siobhan O'Neill - May 29, 2014





Steven Vanholme: Could you be the first hotel group on 100% renewable energy?Duncan Lauder: Waste ManagementVilnis Vesma: Communicating Sustainability to GuestsAnthony James: Hoteliers getting cosy with biomass offers could be leaving themselves in the coldalex tsuk: Leading hotels collaborate to drive water stewardship 




  

ITP
 

FacebookTwitterRSS FeedLinkedIn
Twitter: green_hotelier
RT @Hotelogix: How to Improve Your #Hotel’s Energy Efficiency and Save Costs.
https://t.co/Ki1OX9TfeY
#GreenHotel @Green_Hotelier https://t… 12:35:55 PM July 21, 2017 from Twitter Web Client ReplyRetweetFavoriteRT @UPS_News: @Green_Hotelier UPS's 15th annual Sustainability Report is out. Here are the key takeaways & future plans: https://t.co/Pcl8s… 12:35:47 PM July 21, 2017 from Twitter Web Client ReplyRetweetFavoriteGood green messaging from @RBEhotels Bloomsbury https://t.co/A75ouqWkVz 05:57:17 PM July 19, 2017 from Twitter for iPhone ReplyRetweetFavoriteRT @James_BG: As everyone works themselves into a fury over BBC salaries, this is the biggest story of the week (or any week) https://t.co/… 04:59:11 PM July 19, 2017 from Twitter for iPhone ReplyRetweetFavoriteNot often @Green_Hotelier gets to be a guest but very excited to be staying @RBEhotels Bloomsbury. https://t.co/UbOlz3csrD 04:58:58 PM July 19, 2017 from Twitter for iPhone ReplyRetweetFavorite@green_hotelier





 
THEMES



 DESTINATIONS



 RESOURCES



 NEWS








Green Hotelier
Contact Us
Green Hotels
Sustainable Destinations
Green Hotel News
Eco Solutions



Terms
Terms & Conditions
Privacy & Cookies Policy
Image Policy




Accessibility
Accessibility
Site Map




Links
ITP
YCI
BITC




Contact
Email: info@greenhotelier.org 
Tel: 020 7566 6664 

Green Hotelier
  c/o Business in the Community
  137 Shepherdess Walk, 
  London N1 7RQ




greenhotelier.org
The leading website for global green hotel & sustainable destination news, green hotel case studies, know how & advice.








		
			Website designed and developed by Artificial Art for Green Hotelier
		
	

Log in - 			
				
		

















 






Christopher J. Nassetta | Green Hotelier






















































Register
Site Map
Privacy & Cookies Policy













            
            	            
            	Welcome Guest - Sign in | Register






















Home
About Us

Advertising on Green Hotelier
Contributing to Green Hotelier
Green Hotelier’s Editorial Plan 2017


Themes

Waste
Water
Community, Communication & Engagement
Energy & Carbon
New Builds & Retro Fits
Policy, Certification & Economics
Supply Chain
Workplace


Destinations

Africa & The Middle East
Americas
Asia Pacific
Europe


Best Practice

Industry Leaders
Case Studies
Talking Point


Resources

Manuals
Know How Guides
Useful Organisations
Tools
Further Reading
Environmental Management for Hotels
Sustainable Siting Construction and Design


News

Industry News
Events


Contact Us

FAQs


Directory

Energy
Housekeeping
Kitchen
Water





 

Christopher J. Nassetta

October 29, 2009  |  
Filed under: Industry Leaders  |  
Posted by: admin


Position - Former President and CEO, Hilton Hotels Corporation
Background
Christopher J. Nassetta joined Hilton Hotels Corporation as president and CEO in December 2007. Previously he was president CEO of Host Hotels & Resorts, Inc. a position he held since 2000. He joined Host in 1995 as executive vice president and was elected chief operating officer in 1997. Before joining Host, Mr Nassetta co-founded Bailey Capital Corporation in 1991, where he was responsible for the operations of the real estate investment and advisory firm. Prior to founding Bailey Capital Corporation, he spent seven years at The Oliver Carr Company, ultimately serving as chief development officer. In this role he was responsible for all development and related activities for one of the largest commercial real estate companies in the mid-Atlantic region. Mr Nassetta serves on the following boards and organisations:-

CoStar Group Inc
The Real Estate Roundtable, which he chairs
Federal City Council member
McIntire School of Commerce Advisory Board for the University of Virginia.
Los Angeles World Affairs Council

Christopher discusses Hilton
It is challenging to measure the success of business earned from individual business and leisure travellers based on our sustainability commitments and activities. We believe that guests choose our Hilton Family of Hotels primarily based on their strong reputation for providing excellent products and services. Hospitality is our business. Sustainability is a lens, a discipline we use to support our overall business of hospitality.
Having said that, we are reviewing our purchasing, design and construction practices, as well as brand standards to maximise efficiencies in all areas while maintaining the highest levels of customer satisfaction. The company’s We Care! programme throughout Europe, which is being rolled into the more recent global commitments outlined herein, reported last April that reduction in energy and water consumption resulted in saving more than US$9m since the programme started in 2005—proving that sustainability is good business.
Moving forward, our mission is to manage our business through a lens of sustainability and find ways to innovate with our products and offerings. We will create better experiences for our guests, better business opportunities for our partners and investors, better work facilities for our colleagues and better serve our communities. By managing our business in this fashion, and supporting our overall strategic objectives, we feel we will create tangible business value for all of our stakeholders.
I'm most proud of our team members across the globe, and the passion and enthusiasm they show every day for not only providing the best guest experience possible, but finding ways to accomplish this with a like-minded focus on minimising our impact on the environment. Our team members are the real innovators and it is their efforts that I am most proud of. Beyond that, in our European region, energy and water consumption have already been reduced by 10% in the past two years. In the UK and Ireland, the introduction of carbon-free electricity has reduced CO2 emissions in participating Hilton hotels by more than 64,000 tons, or 56% of our carbon footprint. In the United States, Hilton was the first in the industry to complete the installation of a commercial fuel cell power system, atop the Hilton New York, delivering one of the cleanest power-generating technologies available today.
I think the biggest lesson so far is that we still have much to learn. To meet the growing demand of increased travel around the world, we must be able to do so in a genuine, sustainable fashion while still delivering unsurpassed levels of hospitality, including a better night’s sleep, an enhanced dining experience and a more productive meeting. We must operate our business in ways that provide for our current needs while allowing future generations to meet their own needs. This is the essence of sustainability and the path we must follow. Not only is it the right thing to do as responsible global citizens, it's the right thing to do for our business. We have come a long way as a company and have learned so much to date, but I am personally excited about the opportunities and challenges in front of us as we continue our journey.
Education will play a vital role for Hilton Hotels Corporation in the short- and long-term on multiple levels. As it relates to sustainability, Hilton Hotels Corporation is supporting its portfolio of commitments in a number of ways by:

Building educational and engagement programmes for all brands and team members, including online learning, centralised web content and various training modules.
Measuring and reporting on our progress. The internal environmental management tool used within company-managed hotels will be extended to all properties, allowing us to track and report on our commitments and design processes and programmes that identify areas of opportunity to drive innovation and efficiencies.
Revising brand operational and design and construction standards for 2009 to ensure both internal and external best practices are shared, adopted and transparent around the globe.
Evaluating all current and future purchasing policies and practices across the brands to ensure that the range of products placed in hotels not only enhances the guest experience but drives value for owners while supporting the company’s overall sustainability efforts.

The sum of these parts will hopefully begin to lay a foundation of knowledge around sustainability and allow us to effectively build sustainability into the organisation in a measurable and meaningful way.
We plan to build on the foundation and success established by our teams in Europe, Africa and the UK as well as our global HR learning and development team. The evolution will include a portfolio of content to engage our team members and guests, share best practices and supply tips, resources, and knowledge. The end result is hopefully to provide our stakeholders with a tool kit that will empower each person to make the most effective decisions possible around understanding sustainability and our impacts while looking at our business through a new lens that will enhance the guest experience and drive business value.
Right now there are several macro economic issues that are driving sustainability. Irrespective of where you stand on climate change, it remains fact that population growth, globalisation, and industrialisation are all accelerating the depletion of natural resources. Demand for energy and food continues to grow and fresh water scarcity is becoming a reality. How we respond to these challenges in meaningful ways will determine the sustainability of our future lifestyles, our communities as we know them and ultimately the sustainability of our planet.
In addition to these large macro issues, we're seeing a growing awareness from our guests, business partners, governments, and team members. These issues are not regional, temporary, or independent of one another and, going forward, we must act and focus on sustainability in a thoughtful, coordinated, and disciplined manner.
As a result of these drivers, Hilton Hotels Corporation recently announced its short- and long-term goals and objectives towards building sustainability into the core fabric of its businesses worldwide. By 2014, goals for the Hilton family of hotels are to:

Reduce energy consumption from direct operations by 20%
Reduce Co2 emissions by 20%
Reduce output of waste by 20% and
Reduce water consumption by 10%

As a global business serving more than a quarter billion guests a year in more than 3,000 hotels across 74 countries and territories, the Hilton family of hotels, including Hilton, Conrad Hotels & Resorts, Doubletree, Embassy Suites Hotels, Hampton Inn and Suites, Hilton Garden Inn, Hilton Grand Vacations, Homewood Suites by Hilton and The Waldorf-Astoria Collection, are well-positioned to make a difference environmentally, socially, culturally and economically.
In addition to the stated measurable short-term targets, the company has also committed to focusing on several high-impact areas that offer significant long-term benefits. Sustainable buildings and operations, including the advancement of sustainable design and construction, operations, chemical management and purchasing will be one key area. We also are committed to the advancement of renewable energy as a source of power for our operations, not only to reduce our carbon footprint but to develop a viable commercial infrastructure for powering hotels and corporate offices.
 Email This Post
   
				 Print This Post
FacebookTwitterLinkedinGoogleRSS



Leave a Reply Cancel replyYou must be logged in to post a comment. 
 

Green Hotelier Newsletter





Subscribe to our mailing list






  

 

Latest
Popular
Comments





 Tongsai Bay: champions of nature
by Siobhan O'Neill - July 17, 2017


 Diamond Resorts share the sustainability message
by Siobhan O'Neill - July 14, 2017


 Talking Point: Are you sending your water straight down the drain?
by Siobhan O'Neill - July 11, 2017


 Power hungry hotels need to reduce their future energy needs now
by Siobhan O'Neill - July 10, 2017


 Talking Point: How can hotels work with refugees?
by Siobhan O'Neill - July 4, 2017






 Water Management and Responsibility in Hotels
by Holly Tuppen - March 22, 2013


 Simple steps to reducing energy consumption
by Holly Tuppen - January 4, 2013


 Reducing and Managing Food Waste in Hotels
by Holly Tuppen - September 2, 2014


 Cyprus takes the lead on sustainable destinations
by Siobhan O'Neill - June 18, 2014


 Brazil World Cup tourism – negative or positive impact?
by Siobhan O'Neill - May 29, 2014





Steven Vanholme: Could you be the first hotel group on 100% renewable energy?Duncan Lauder: Waste ManagementVilnis Vesma: Communicating Sustainability to GuestsAnthony James: Hoteliers getting cosy with biomass offers could be leaving themselves in the coldalex tsuk: Leading hotels collaborate to drive water stewardship 




  

ITP
 

FacebookTwitterRSS FeedLinkedIn
Twitter: green_hotelier
RT @Hotelogix: How to Improve Your #Hotel’s Energy Efficiency and Save Costs.
https://t.co/Ki1OX9TfeY
#GreenHotel @Green_Hotelier https://t… 12:35:55 PM July 21, 2017 from Twitter Web Client ReplyRetweetFavoriteRT @UPS_News: @Green_Hotelier UPS's 15th annual Sustainability Report is out. Here are the key takeaways & future plans: https://t.co/Pcl8s… 12:35:47 PM July 21, 2017 from Twitter Web Client ReplyRetweetFavoriteGood green messaging from @RBEhotels Bloomsbury https://t.co/A75ouqWkVz 05:57:17 PM July 19, 2017 from Twitter for iPhone ReplyRetweetFavoriteRT @James_BG: As everyone works themselves into a fury over BBC salaries, this is the biggest story of the week (or any week) https://t.co/… 04:59:11 PM July 19, 2017 from Twitter for iPhone ReplyRetweetFavoriteNot often @Green_Hotelier gets to be a guest but very excited to be staying @RBEhotels Bloomsbury. https://t.co/UbOlz3csrD 04:58:58 PM July 19, 2017 from Twitter for iPhone ReplyRetweetFavorite@green_hotelier





 
THEMES



 DESTINATIONS



 RESOURCES



 NEWS








Green Hotelier
Contact Us
Green Hotels
Sustainable Destinations
Green Hotel News
Eco Solutions



Terms
Terms & Conditions
Privacy & Cookies Policy
Image Policy




Accessibility
Accessibility
Site Map




Links
ITP
YCI
BITC




Contact
Email: info@greenhotelier.org 
Tel: 020 7566 6664 

Green Hotelier
  c/o Business in the Community
  137 Shepherdess Walk, 
  London N1 7RQ




greenhotelier.org
The leading website for global green hotel & sustainable destination news, green hotel case studies, know how & advice.








		
			Website designed and developed by Artificial Art for Green Hotelier
		
	

Log in - 			
				
		

















 



 




Christopher Nassetta of Hilton, on Focusing Its Values - The New York Times





































































































































NYTimes.com no longer supports Internet Explorer 9 or earlier. Please upgrade your browser.
LEARN MORE »









Sections

Home

Search
Skip to content
Skip to navigation
View mobile version




The New York Times





Business Day|On a Busy Road, a Company Needs Guardrails







Search

Subscribe Now
Log In
0
Settings




Close search



https://nyti.ms/RQ5g5F








Advertisement








Supported by



Business Day

On a Busy Road, a Company Needs Guardrails



Corner Office 
By                     
 ADAM BRYANT
 
OCT. 13, 2012




Continue reading the main story
Share This Page

Continue reading the main story









This interview with 
Christopher J. Nassetta, president and chief executive of Hilton Worldwide, was conducted and condensed by 
Adam Bryant. Q. Tell me about some of the leadership challenges you tackled at Hilton.A. Over the last several years, we have focused on transforming the culture and the priorities of the company. We have over 300,000 people, and what I discovered when I joined the company five years ago is that we had a lot of segments of the company that operated very independently, and we had massive amounts of duplication and fragmentation. We needed alignment. We needed people to understand who we were, what we stood for and the key priorities of the company. And we needed them, once they understood that, to get their oars in the water and head in a common direction. I have spent most of my time in the last five years around building that culture, and getting that alignment.Q. Give me more of a sense of the problems you discovered.A. I would ask people, what are the three or four key strategic priorities? But as many people as I asked, I got a different answer. We always had good values, but I just don’t think people understood what they really were. In those first months when I traveled around the world, I stopped counting when I got to 30 different value statements at our offices. So we tried to simplify everything.

Advertisement

Continue reading the main story

I think of culture as guardrails. The culture of a company is what you stand for, essentially the ground rules so that people know how to operate. You give them a direction and boundaries. The trick is having an intense alignment around vision, mission, values and the key strategic priorities. My job as C.E.O., simply stated, is to create the right culture, set the tone, the high-level strategy. Continue reading the main story







Advertisement

Continue reading the main story





Q. What sort of exercise did you go through to figure out the values?A. We did a lot of work with teams around the world, and asked people to look at all their values statements and boil them down. Then we took all those ideas with us on a two-day offsite with about 12 of us. There was a lot of overlap, and we tried to consolidate it. What I ended up saying to them was, let’s use some of our own skills and brand it, not because I want to be cute about it, but because people will remember it. I started looking around the room and at the letters and they came together as HILTON — H for hospitality, I for integrity, L for leadership, T for teamwork, O for ownership and N for now. To reinforce them, we are constantly referring to the letters — in newsletters, in town halls — almost to the point where we are driving people crazy. But it works.
Photo






Christopher J. Nassetta, president and C.E.O. of Hilton Worldwide, says he has spent much of his time seeking to align the company's vision, boundaries and priorities.

Credit
            Librado Romero/The New York Times        


Q. I’ve heard a lot of leaders talk about the importance of repetition.A. You have to be careful as a leader, particularly of a big organization. You can find yourself communicating the same thing so many times that you get tired of hearing it. And so you might alter how you say it, or shorthand it, because you have literally said it so many times that you think nobody else on earth could want to hear this. But you can’t stop. In my case, there are 300,000 people who need to hear it, and I can’t say it enough. So what might sound mundane and like old news to me isn’t for a lot of other people. That is an important lesson I learned as I worked in bigger organizations.Q. What are some of your other approaches to leadership?A. One simple philosophy I have as a leader of a big organization is to have really steady hands on the wheel. In a tumultuous world, with so many things going on around you, you have to know who you are, what you stand for and where you are going, and keep everyone pointed in the same direction and have the discipline to stick with it.
Newsletter Sign Up
Continue reading the main story

  


Please verify you're not a robot by clicking the box.
Invalid email address. Please re-enter.
You must select a newsletter to subscribe to.



Sign Up







You agree to receive occasional updates and special offers for The New York Times's products and services.





Thank you for subscribing.
An error has occurred. Please try again later.
You are already subscribed to this email.
View all New York Times newsletters.


See Sample
Manage Email Preferences
Not you?
Privacy Policy
Opt out or contact us anytime




Q. Let’s shift to hiring. What questions do you ask?A. The one thing I am always trying to figure out first and foremost with people is what makes them tick, and what motivates them. And are they good communicators? Even the smartest people in the world, if they can’t communicate in what is a very big matrix organization like ours that requires collaboration, they are not going to be able to persuade and motivate people, and that is going to be a problem. Another thing I am always looking for is humility. I’m not looking for big egos.Q. And how do you get a sense of that?A. You ask them about all they have done, then listen for whether it’s all about me, me, me, or about teams they’ve worked on. I’ll say: Tell me some of the more interesting projects you have been involved with, and how did they go? Tell me about some of the more difficult things you have done, and how did you resolve them?Q. And if you could ask somebody only a few questions in an interview?A. I would probably just ask them straight-up questions because I am pretty good at reading people. I would probably say: How do you think about operating in a matrix organization? And would people around you — those you’ve worked with side-by-side, above and below — think you have a big ego? How would people judge your ego?Q. Don’t people know the right answer and simply say: “No. I don’t have a big ego”?A. It depends on how they say it. They might give that answer, but do they “um” and “er” and do their eyes wander? If you watch body language, you can tell a lot. You would be amazed at some of the answers you get. Some people just admit it. I have had more than one in 10 people say, “yeah, I’m strong-willed, and sometimes my peers will think I am arrogant or have a little too much ego.”Q. Is that a deal-breaker for you?A. Generally, yes.Q. But at least they’re somewhat self-aware.A. I love the self-aware part. But, unfortunately, it’s hard to make it work in an organization like ours, where big egos get in the way. I’m not saying that occasionally we don’t have some egos, and you have to manage them. But you certainly can’t have a lot of them and still accomplish your goals.
Continue reading the main story






We’re interested in your feedback on this page. Tell us what you think.




















Corner Office
Conversations with Adam Bryant about leadership and management.









                                Lyft’s John Zimmer on Empowering Others to Help Them Grow            
JUL 21








                                Erika Nardini on the Value of Leading ‘10 Percent’ Players            
JUL 14








                                Don Mal on the Relentless Pursuit of Making Your Numbers            
JUL 7








                                Lt. Gen. Nadja Y. West on the Power of Empathy            
JUN 30








                                Joe Andrew on Building a Culture to Encourage Creativity            
JUN 23












What's Next


Loading...









Go to Home Page »

Site Index

The New York Times
























 




Christopher Nassetta of Hilton, on Focusing Its Values - The New York Times





































































































































NYTimes.com no longer supports Internet Explorer 9 or earlier. Please upgrade your browser.
LEARN MORE »









Sections

Home

Search
Skip to content
Skip to navigation
View mobile version




The New York Times





Business Day|On a Busy Road, a Company Needs Guardrails







Search

Subscribe Now
Log In
0
Settings




Close search



https://nyti.ms/RQ5g5F








Advertisement








Supported by



Business Day

On a Busy Road, a Company Needs Guardrails



Corner Office 
By                     
 ADAM BRYANT
 
OCT. 13, 2012




Continue reading the main story
Share This Page

Continue reading the main story









This interview with 
Christopher J. Nassetta, president and chief executive of Hilton Worldwide, was conducted and condensed by 
Adam Bryant. Q. Tell me about some of the leadership challenges you tackled at Hilton.A. Over the last several years, we have focused on transforming the culture and the priorities of the company. We have over 300,000 people, and what I discovered when I joined the company five years ago is that we had a lot of segments of the company that operated very independently, and we had massive amounts of duplication and fragmentation. We needed alignment. We needed people to understand who we were, what we stood for and the key priorities of the company. And we needed them, once they understood that, to get their oars in the water and head in a common direction. I have spent most of my time in the last five years around building that culture, and getting that alignment.Q. Give me more of a sense of the problems you discovered.A. I would ask people, what are the three or four key strategic priorities? But as many people as I asked, I got a different answer. We always had good values, but I just don’t think people understood what they really were. In those first months when I traveled around the world, I stopped counting when I got to 30 different value statements at our offices. So we tried to simplify everything.

Advertisement

Continue reading the main story

I think of culture as guardrails. The culture of a company is what you stand for, essentially the ground rules so that people know how to operate. You give them a direction and boundaries. The trick is having an intense alignment around vision, mission, values and the key strategic priorities. My job as C.E.O., simply stated, is to create the right culture, set the tone, the high-level strategy. Continue reading the main story







Advertisement

Continue reading the main story





Q. What sort of exercise did you go through to figure out the values?A. We did a lot of work with teams around the world, and asked people to look at all their values statements and boil them down. Then we took all those ideas with us on a two-day offsite with about 12 of us. There was a lot of overlap, and we tried to consolidate it. What I ended up saying to them was, let’s use some of our own skills and brand it, not because I want to be cute about it, but because people will remember it. I started looking around the room and at the letters and they came together as HILTON — H for hospitality, I for integrity, L for leadership, T for teamwork, O for ownership and N for now. To reinforce them, we are constantly referring to the letters — in newsletters, in town halls — almost to the point where we are driving people crazy. But it works.
Photo






Christopher J. Nassetta, president and C.E.O. of Hilton Worldwide, says he has spent much of his time seeking to align the company's vision, boundaries and priorities.

Credit
            Librado Romero/The New York Times        


Q. I’ve heard a lot of leaders talk about the importance of repetition.A. You have to be careful as a leader, particularly of a big organization. You can find yourself communicating the same thing so many times that you get tired of hearing it. And so you might alter how you say it, or shorthand it, because you have literally said it so many times that you think nobody else on earth could want to hear this. But you can’t stop. In my case, there are 300,000 people who need to hear it, and I can’t say it enough. So what might sound mundane and like old news to me isn’t for a lot of other people. That is an important lesson I learned as I worked in bigger organizations.Q. What are some of your other approaches to leadership?A. One simple philosophy I have as a leader of a big organization is to have really steady hands on the wheel. In a tumultuous world, with so many things going on around you, you have to know who you are, what you stand for and where you are going, and keep everyone pointed in the same direction and have the discipline to stick with it.
Newsletter Sign Up
Continue reading the main story

  


Please verify you're not a robot by clicking the box.
Invalid email address. Please re-enter.
You must select a newsletter to subscribe to.



Sign Up







You agree to receive occasional updates and special offers for The New York Times's products and services.





Thank you for subscribing.
An error has occurred. Please try again later.
You are already subscribed to this email.
View all New York Times newsletters.


See Sample
Manage Email Preferences
Not you?
Privacy Policy
Opt out or contact us anytime




Q. Let’s shift to hiring. What questions do you ask?A. The one thing I am always trying to figure out first and foremost with people is what makes them tick, and what motivates them. And are they good communicators? Even the smartest people in the world, if they can’t communicate in what is a very big matrix organization like ours that requires collaboration, they are not going to be able to persuade and motivate people, and that is going to be a problem. Another thing I am always looking for is humility. I’m not looking for big egos.Q. And how do you get a sense of that?A. You ask them about all they have done, then listen for whether it’s all about me, me, me, or about teams they’ve worked on. I’ll say: Tell me some of the more interesting projects you have been involved with, and how did they go? Tell me about some of the more difficult things you have done, and how did you resolve them?Q. And if you could ask somebody only a few questions in an interview?A. I would probably just ask them straight-up questions because I am pretty good at reading people. I would probably say: How do you think about operating in a matrix organization? And would people around you — those you’ve worked with side-by-side, above and below — think you have a big ego? How would people judge your ego?Q. Don’t people know the right answer and simply say: “No. I don’t have a big ego”?A. It depends on how they say it. They might give that answer, but do they “um” and “er” and do their eyes wander? If you watch body language, you can tell a lot. You would be amazed at some of the answers you get. Some people just admit it. I have had more than one in 10 people say, “yeah, I’m strong-willed, and sometimes my peers will think I am arrogant or have a little too much ego.”Q. Is that a deal-breaker for you?A. Generally, yes.Q. But at least they’re somewhat self-aware.A. I love the self-aware part. But, unfortunately, it’s hard to make it work in an organization like ours, where big egos get in the way. I’m not saying that occasionally we don’t have some egos, and you have to manage them. But you certainly can’t have a lot of them and still accomplish your goals.
Continue reading the main story






We’re interested in your feedback on this page. Tell us what you think.




















Corner Office
Conversations with Adam Bryant about leadership and management.









                                Lyft’s John Zimmer on Empowering Others to Help Them Grow            
JUL 21








                                Erika Nardini on the Value of Leading ‘10 Percent’ Players            
JUL 14








                                Don Mal on the Relentless Pursuit of Making Your Numbers            
JUL 7








                                Lt. Gen. Nadja Y. West on the Power of Empathy            
JUN 30








                                Joe Andrew on Building a Culture to Encourage Creativity            
JUN 23












What's Next


Loading...









Go to Home Page »

Site Index

The New York Times






























Hilton Hotels Corporation Appoints Christopher Nassetta as President and CEO 








































menuclose









Industry Update




Press Release29 October 2007Hilton Hotels Corporation Appoints Christopher Nassetta as President and CEO 
Blackstone Reaffirms Ambitious Growth Strategy 

BEVERLY HILLS, Calif. & NEW YORK | Hilton Hotels Corporation (“Hilton”) and The Blackstone Group (NYSE:BX) (“Blackstone”) today announced the appointment of Christopher J. Nassetta as President and Chief Executive Officer of Hilton. Mr. Nassetta currently leads Host Hotels and Resorts, the largest owner of luxury and upscale hotels in the world. Mr. Nassetta joins Hilton as the company moves into an exciting new phase of growth, both in the U.S. and abroad.

The Blackstone Group’s real estate and corporate private equity funds completed the acquisition of Hilton on October 24, 2007. Blackstone views Hilton as an important strategic investment and intends to invest in its properties and brands to enhance the Company’s growth. As stated at the time of the initial announcement in July, Blackstone has no intention of selling any brands or major assets as a result of the transaction.

Jonathan Gray, Senior Managing Director, Blackstone said, “Our goal with Hilton is to build the premier global hospitality company. We are confident that Chris will be a superb addition to the already strong Hilton team. Given his background overseeing the world’s largest hotel ownership company, Chris understands the needs of hotel owners and is uniquely qualified to lead Hilton. I’ve known Chris personally for 15 years and have worked successfully side-by-side with him in the past. He’s a man of the absolute highest integrity, who cares deeply about people. He has the energy, enthusiasm and experience to lead Hilton, and it’s with great pleasure that we welcome him to the team.”
Blackstone’s strategy includes maintaining strong unit growth in the U.S., where more than 20% of all hotel rooms currently under construction carry a Hilton brand. Blackstone will also invest to accelerate the company’s international growth, building on recent agreements to expand the Hilton family of brands outside of the U.S. through a series of strategic partnerships. It was only last year that Hilton merged with Hilton International, a transaction which created a new set of global opportunities for the company. Additionally, Blackstone intends to incorporate a significant portion of its existing portfolio of luxury hotels and resorts onto the Hilton platform, adding to the luxury offerings available to Hilton customers. Blackstone’s holdings include such upscale properties as The Boulders Resort and Spa (Arizona), The El Conquistador Resort (Puerto Rico), and The Boca Raton Resort and Club (Florida).
Chris Nassetta commented, “I am excited to join this great company and am looking forward to working with Hilton’s franchisees, owners and team members to grow this already impressive franchise. Hilton has a powerful collection of brands and we now have the opportunity to build on the strong foundation that already exists to drive the company’s growth, particularly overseas, to create the pre-eminent lodging company in the world. I also look forward to working with Blackstone, who I know from experience will be a terrific strategic partner for Hilton going forward.”
As President and CEO of Hilton, Mr. Nassetta will oversee Hilton’s extensive line of quality brands, including: Hilton, Conrad, Doubletree, Embassy Suites, Hampton, Hilton Garden Inn, Hilton Grand Vacations, Homewood Suites by Hilton, and The Waldorf=Astoria Collection. Mr. Nassetta intends to work closely with the existing management team, including Thomas Keltner, Chief Executive Officer - Americas and Global Brands, and Ian Carter, Chief Executive Officer - Hilton International. As previously announced, Stephen F. Bollenbach retired from the company last week upon the completion of the transaction. Additionally, Matthew J. Hart will step down as president and chief operating officer but will serve as a member of Hilton’s Board of Directors.
About Christopher Nassetta
Christopher J. Nassetta will join Hilton Hotels Corp. from Host Hotels & Resorts, where he has been President and Chief Executive Officer since 2000. Prior to joining Host, Mr. Nassetta co-founded Bailey Capital Corporation in 1991, where he was responsible for the operations of the real estate investment and advisory firm. He also spent seven years serving as Chief Development Officer and in various other positions with The Oliver Carr Company. Mr. Nassetta serves as a Director of CoStar Group, Inc., is Second Vice Chair and serves on the Board of Governors of National Association of Real Estate Investment Trusts, is a member and chairman of The Real Estate Roundtable, and is a member of the McIntire School of Commerce Advisory Board for the University of Virginia.
Mr. Nassetta graduated from the University of Virginia McIntire School of Commerce with a degree in finance and studied international finance at the London School of Economics.

About Hilton | Hilton Hotels Corporation is the leading global hospitality company, with 2,896 properties totaling approximately 500,000 rooms in 76 countries and territories.
The company owns, manages or franchises a hotel portfolio of some of the best known and highly regarded brands, including Hilton®, Conrad® Hotels & Resorts, Doubletree®, Embassy Suites Hotels®, Hampton Inn®, Hampton Inn & Suites®, Hilton Garden Inn®, Hilton Grand VacationsTM, Homewood Suites by Hilton® and The Waldorf=Astoria Collection®.
About Blackstone | The Blackstone Group (NYSE:BX) is a leading global alternative asset manager and provider of financial advisory services. Its alternative asset management businesses include the management of corporate private equity funds, real estate opportunity funds, funds of hedge funds, mezzanine funds, senior debt funds, proprietary hedge funds and closed-end mutual funds. The Blackstone Group also provides various financial advisory services, including mergers and acquisitions advisory, restructuring and reorganization advisory and fund placement services.
Forward-Looking Statements | This press release contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of federal securities law, including statements concerning business strategies and their intended results, and similar statements concerning anticipated future events and expectations that are not historical facts. The forward-looking statements in this press release are subject to numerous risks and uncertainties, including the effects of economic conditions; supply and demand changes for hotel rooms; competitive conditions in the lodging industry, relationships with clients and property owners; the impact of government regulations; changes in foreign currency exchange rates; and the availability of capital to finance growth, which could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed in or implied by the statements herein.
ContactLinda BainSVP - Communications | InternationalPhone: +44 20 7856 8293Fax: +44 20 7856 8463 Send Email



More from Hilton
Related News Articles

A Good Guy for Hilton | washingtonpost.comChris Nassetta may not be the most renowned chief executive in the Washington area -- in fact, if you're not in the hotel business, you've probably never heard of him.   But there is no doubt he is one of the more successful, having transformed Host Hotels & Resorts from an over-leveraged stepchild of Marriott into an independent powerhouse with a global presence, a blue-chip portfolio of properties, strong relations with all the major hotel operators and the strongest balance sheet in the industry.

Editorial 5 Nov 2007




Host Hotels & Resorts Announces the Resignation of Christopher J. Nassetta and the Appointment of W. Edward Walter as President and Chief Executive Officer BETHESDA, Md., Oct. 29 /PRNewswire-FirstCall/ -- Host Hotels & Resorts, Inc. (NYSE:HST) today announced that Christopher J. Nassetta has tendered his resignation as President and Chief Executive Officer of Host Hotels & Resorts, Inc., to become President and Chief Executive Officer of Hilton Hotels Corporation.

Press Release30 Oct 2007








Most Read


Today
Last 7 days
Last 30 days
































More






Newsletter

Subscribe to our daily newsletter


Submit your NewsAdvertising

















Christopher J. Nassetta | UVA McIntire School of Commerce










































Skip to main content









 

UVA McIntire School of Commerce






Search form

Search 





 




Admission to McIntire
Career Services
Student Life
Support McIntire
 

 




Menu

AboutAbout McIntire
Visit McIntire
Staff Directory
McIntire Foundation

Academic ProgramsUndergraduate Program
M.S. in Commerce
M.S. in Accounting
M.S. in Global Commerce
M.S. in Management of IT
Certificate Programs

Faculty & ResearchFaculty Directory
Research Centers
Forums & Symposia
Faculty Publications

Recruiters & CompaniesRecruiting at McIntire
Corporate Relations
Executive Education

Alumni & FriendsOur Alumni
Support McIntire
Get Involved
Resources

 

 














 
 





Christopher J. Nassetta
Home — Christopher J. Nassetta






Christopher Nassetta joined Hilton Worldwide as President and Chief Executive Officer in December 2007. Previously he was President and Chief Executive Officer of Host Hotels & Resorts Inc., a position he held since 2000. He joined Host in 1995 as Executive Vice President and was elected Chief Operating Officer in 1997.
Before joining Host, Mr. Nassetta co-founded Bailey Capital Corporation in 1991, where he was responsible for the operations of the real estate investment and advisory firm. Prior to founding Bailey Capital Corporation, he spent seven years at The Oliver Carr Company, ultimately serving as Chief Development Officer. In this role, he was responsible for all development and related activities for one of the largest commercial real estate companies in the mid-Atlantic region.
​Currently, Mr. Nassetta serves on the following boards: CoStar Group Inc., The Real Estate Round Table, National Association of Real Estate Investment Trusts (NAREIT), and Prime Group Realty Trust. He is also a member of the McIntire School of Commerce Advisory Board.
Mr. Nassetta serves on the following boards and organizations: CoStar Group Inc., The Real Estate Roundtable (RER), Federal City Council, Arlington Free Clinic, Wolf Trap Foundation for the Performing Arts, McIntire School of Commerce Advisory Board, and The John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts.
Mr. Nassetta graduated from the University of Virginia McIntire School of Commerce with a degree in finance. He resides in Virginia with his wife and six children.
 



 

 
 

  




